Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-207.01
Abatement, defined.

Abatement shall include, but not be limited to, any (1) inspection and testing regarding environmental hazards, (2) maintenance to reduce, lessen, put an end to, diminish, moderate, decrease, control, dispose of, or eliminate environmental hazards, (3) removal or encapsulation of environmentally hazardous material or property, (4) restoration or replacement of material or property, (5) related architectural and engineering services, and (6) other action to reduce or eliminate environmental hazards in the school buildings or grounds under the school's control. Abatement shall not include the encapsulation of any material containing more than one percent friable asbestos.

Laws 1989, LB 706, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 8;

Laws 1992, LB 1001, § 6.